Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-123
Foreign protection order; enforcement.

A valid foreign protection order related to domestic or family abuse issued by a tribunal of another state, tribe, or territory shall be accorded full faith and credit by the courts of this state and enforced pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 26;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 99;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 42-931;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 23.

Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act, see section 42-932.